District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.10

Information to employees.

(a)

The Mayor shall make available to each employee information as may be necessary to enable the employee to exercise an informed choice among the types of health benefit plans offered.

(b)

The Mayor shall make available to each employee and annuitant enrolled in a health benefit plan a written statement or summary of:

(1)

The services or benefits, including maximums, limitations, and exclusions, to which the employee, annuitant, or member of the family of the employee or annuitant are entitled;

(2)

The procedures for obtaining benefits; and

(3)

The principal provisions of the health benefit plan affecting the employee, annuitant, or member of the family of the employee or annuitant.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2110
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079
1981 Ed., § 1-622.10.